Mississippi, session 2026, HB694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-1-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-1-33.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided under subsections (6) and (7) of this section, it shall be the duty of the license examiner, when application is made for an operator's license or learner's permit, to test the applicant's ability to read and understand road signs and to give the required signals as adopted by the National Advisory Committee on Uniform Traffic Control Devices and the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators. (2)  Except as otherwise provided under subsections (6) and (7) of this section, the commissioner shall have prepared and administer a test composed of at least ten (10) questions relating to the safe operation of a motor vehicle and testing the applicant's knowledge of the proper operation of a motor vehicle, and conduct a practical road test to ensure the applicant's proper and safe operation and maneuvering of a motor vehicle in a real-time traffic environment.  Every examination shall ensure adequate knowledge on the part of the applicant as to school bus safety requirements. (3)  Prior to the administration of the road test, the license examiner shall inspect the horn, lights, brakes, vehicle registration and proof of liability coverage of the motor vehicle which the applicant expects to operate while being tested, and if he finds that any of the aforementioned items are deficient, no license or endorsement shall be issued to the applicant until same have been repaired. (4)  An applicant for a Mississippi driver's license who, at the time of application, holds a valid motor vehicle driver's license issued by another state shall not be required to take a written test. (5)  Except as otherwise provided by Section 63-1-6, when application is made for an original motorcycle endorsement, the applicant shall be required to pass a written test which consists of questions relating to the safe operation of a motorcycle and a skill test similar to the "Motorcycle Operator Skill Test," which is endorsed by the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators.  The commissioner may exempt any applicant from the skill test if the applicant presents a certificate showing successful completion of a course approved by the commissioner, which includes a similar examination of skills needed in the safe operation of a motorcycle. (6)  The Department of Public Safety shall accept the certification of successful completion of an individual's training in the knowledge and skills needed for the proper and safe operation of a motor vehicle from a driver education and training program at a secondary school that meets the standards of the State Board of Education, in lieu of the department administering the examination of the individual for the purpose of obtaining a driver's license.  The school may employ teachers duly certified by the Department of Education to teach in such a program.  In addition, off-duty members of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol shall be authorized to teach in such a program without having to obtain a teaching certificate from the Department of Education.  Instructors will be considered employees of the school, not of the Driver License Examining Bureau.  The commissioner and the State Board of Education shall jointly promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of this subsection. (7)  The commissioner shall develop an affidavit whereby a parent, teacher or guardian may certify that he or she has witnessed a student operate a motor vehicle for at least fifty (50) hours and attest to the student's proficiency in the proper and safe operation of a motor vehicle and the Department of Public Safety shall accept such in lieu of a skills test conducted by the department. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.